Illinois, session 104th, HB5723.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Epstein Files Investigation Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Jeffrey Epstein engaged in a long-standing pattern 9    of criminal conduct, including human trafficking and 10    sexual exploitation of minors, which spanned multiple 11    jurisdictions and inflicted harm on countless victims.12        (2) Evidence from the investigation and prosecution of 13    Jeffrey Epstein (commonly referred to as the "Epstein 14    files") has implicated numerous associates and public 15    figures in potential crimes, suggesting the existence of a 16    broader network of illicit activities that may have a 17    nexus to the State of Illinois.18        (3) Despite the gravity of these revelations, there is 19    a widespread public perception and concern that federal 20    authorities have failed to fully investigate and bring to 21    justice all individuals involved in or complicit in 22    Epstein's criminal network, undermining confidence in the 23    pursuit of justice at the federal level.  HB5723- 2 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1        (4) The State of Illinois has a sovereign interest and 2    moral obligation to ensure that any violations of Illinois 3    law arising from or related to Jeffrey Epstein's network, 4    including crimes committed on Illinois soil, against 5    Illinois residents, or by public officials or entities 6    subject to Illinois law, are thoroughly investigated and 7    prosecuted, and that the full truth is brought to light.8        (5) It is necessary to create an independent 9    investigatory and oversight advisory body, free from 10    political influence or unnecessary limitations, to 11    aggressively pursue justice, protect victims, expose any 12    public corruption or cover-ups, and restore public trust 13    by ensuring that no individual, no matter how powerful or 14    well-connected, is above the laws of the State of 15    Illinois.16    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish an independent 17Illinois Epstein Files Investigation Commission with the 18mandate and authority to investigate crimes associated with 19Jeffrey Epstein's network and files, to facilitate the 20enforcement of Illinois laws against any such crimes, and to 21ensure transparency and accountability in the investigative 22process. This Act further aims to empower the Illinois 23Attorney General to pursue and prosecute any State-law 24offenses uncovered, thereby ensuring that justice is served 25and that the failures or limitations of federal action do not 26preclude the full pursuit of truth and accountability in   HB5723- 3 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1Illinois. 2    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Commission" means the Illinois Epstein Files 4Investigation Commission established under Section 15 of this 5Act.6    "Victim" means an individual who has suffered physical, 7emotional, or financial harm as a result of conduct described 8in Section 5 of this Act. 9    Section 15. Illinois Epstein Files Investigation 10Commission; establishment and composition.11    (a) The Illinois Epstein Files Investigation Commission is 12created as an investigatory and advisory commission for the 13purposes set forth in Section 5 of this Act.14    (b) The Commission shall consist of 10 members who are 15appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the 16Senate, at least 3 of whom shall have membership in a different 17political party than the Governor. Members of the Commission 18shall have the education, experience, or combination of 19education and experience necessary to carry out the duties 20required of a member of the Commission and shall reflect the 21diversity of the State.22    (c) Appointments shall be made within 60 days after the 23effective date of this Act. Vacancies shall be filled in the 24same manner as the original appointment. Members shall serve   HB5723- 4 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1without compensation but may be reimbursed, subject to 2appropriation, for expenses incurred as a result of duties as 3a member of the Commission. 4    (d) The Commission shall elect 2 co-chairpersons from 5among its members. The co-chairpersons may not be members of 6the same political party. A majority of members constitutes a 7quorum. The Commission shall meet at least monthly and is 8subject to the Open Meetings Act. 9    (e) The Commission may adopt rules of procedure, hire 10staff, and request assistance from State agencies as needed to 11carry out its duties under this Act. Staff shall be 12nonpartisan and hired on the basis of merit. The Commission's 13expenses are subject to appropriation. 14    Section 20. Powers and duties of the Commission. The 15Commission shall have investigatory and advisory powers 16necessary to carry out its duties under this Act. These powers 17include the authority:18        (1) to conduct inquiries and gather information 19    related to potential violations of Illinois law connected 20    to matters described in this Act;21        (2) to request records and information from State and 22    local agencies; 23        (3) to issue subpoenas for documents and testimony, 24    enforceable through petition to a circuit court; 25        (4) to administer oaths and take testimony and to   HB5723- 5 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1    maintain records of proceedings; 2        (5) to hold public hearings or open meetings and 3    nonpublic hearings or closed meetings consistent with the 4    Open Meetings Act; 5        (6) to refer evidence of possible criminal or civil 6    violations to the Attorney General or other appropriate 7    authorities; 8        (7) to make recommendations and issue reports to the 9    Attorney General, Governor, and General Assembly; and10        (8) to coordinate with law enforcement agencies for 11    technical assistance.12    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to grant the 13Commission prosecutorial authority. 14    Section 25. Reports; hearings; records.15    (a) The Commission shall issue: 16        (1) an initial report within 12 months after its first 17    meeting, summarizing its activities and preliminary 18    findings; and 19        (2) a final report before its scheduled cessation of 20    operations under Section 40, detailing its findings and 21    recommendations. 22    Reports shall be submitted to the Attorney General, the 23Governor, and the General Assembly and shall be made available 24to the public. Reports shall only omit or redact information 25that is confidential by law or that could jeopardize   HB5723- 6 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1investigations or safety. 2    (b) The Commission shall hold at least one public hearing 3every 6 months. Hearings shall comply with the Open Meetings 4Act. Transcripts or recordings of public hearings shall be 5posted on the Commission's website with necessary redactions. 6    (c) The Commission shall prepare and submit referrals for 7prosecution to the Attorney General upon discovery of 8sufficient evidence of possible criminal or civil violations.9    (d) The Commission may maintain a public website to post 10reports, hearing materials, and other information determined 11by the Commission to be releasable under law and to not be 12confidential under subsection (e). The Commission shall also 13publish an index of categories of records in its possession, 14except that descriptions may be generalized if disclosure 15could jeopardize investigations or safety. 16    (e) Records not released under subsection (d) are 17confidential to the extent permitted by law, including any 18applicable exemptions under the Freedom of Information Act. 19The Commission is a public body under the Freedom of 20Information Act and the Open Meetings Act. Before cessation of 21operations, records shall be handled as provided in Section 2240. 23    Section 30. Victim and whistleblower protections; safety.24    (a) The Commission shall coordinate with the Attorney 25General's Crime Victim Services Division, the Illinois   HB5723- 7 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1Criminal Justice Information Authority, and local victim 2assistance programs to inform victims of available services 3and to facilitate their access to support. The Commission 4shall accommodate victims' preferences regarding testimony and 5confidentiality. 6    (b) Individuals who provide information to the Commission 7are protected under the Illinois Whistleblower Act and, if 8applicable, the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. The 9Commission shall provide written notice to individuals who 10submit information under this Act that they may have rights 11and remedies under the Illinois Whistleblower Act and the 12State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. The Commission shall 13establish procedures to accept and preserve sensitive or 14anonymous disclosures and may refer potential retaliation to 15the Attorney General or a State's Attorney.16    (c) The Commission, in consultation with law enforcement, 17shall take measures to ensure the safety of victims, 18witnesses, whistleblowers, Commission members, and staff. This 19may include holding nonpublic sessions and coordinating use of 20witness protection resources under existing State programs. 21    Section 35. Attorney General authority.22    (a) The Attorney General has concurrent authority with 23State's Attorneys to investigate and prosecute violations of 24Illinois law arising from matters described in this Act. This 25authority is in addition to existing powers under law. Nothing   HB5723- 8 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1in this subsection alters the consent or good cause provisions 2under the Statewide Grand Jury Act with respect to proceedings 3under that Act.4    (b) The Attorney General and the Commission may share 5information as permitted by law and by court order. Upon 6request by the Commission, after a referral of evidence or 7referral for prosecution by the Commission to the Attorney 8General under this Act, the Attorney General shall provide, as 9soon as practicable, all relevant information to the 10Commission that is related to the referral, except as 11prohibited by law or by court order. 12    Section 40. Repeal. The Commission shall cease operations 135 years after the effective date of this Act. This Act is 14repealed and the Commission is dissolved 6 years after the 15effective date of this Act. The cessation of operations does 16not affect and the repeal does not affect any prosecution, 17indictment, or civil action pending or initiated before those 18dates. Immediately before cessation of operations, the 19Commission shall transfer active investigatory files to the 20Attorney General and all other records to the State Archives 21under applicable confidentiality laws, subject to any 22requirements under the State Records Act. Confidential records 23under subsection (e) of Section 25 of this Act that are 24transferred to the State Archives shall be marked as 25restricted and confidential with instructions, as determined   HB5723- 9 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1by the Commission, regarding access to the confidential 2records, as required under subsection (4) of Section 7 of the 3State Records Act. 4    Section 50. The Statewide Grand Jury Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2 and 3 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 215/2)7    Sec. 2. (a) County grand juries and State's Attorneys have 8always had and shall continue to have primary responsibility 9for investigating, indicting, and prosecuting persons who 10violate the criminal laws of the State of Illinois. However, 11in recent years organized terrorist activity directed against 12innocent civilians and certain criminal enterprises have 13developed that require investigation, indictment, and 14prosecution on a statewide or multicounty level. The criminal 15enterprises exist as a result of the allure of profitability 16present in narcotic activity, the unlawful sale and transfer 17of firearms, and streetgang related felonies and organized 18terrorist activity is supported by the contribution of money 19and expert assistance from geographically diverse sources. In 20order to shut off the life blood of terrorism and weaken or 21eliminate the criminal enterprises, assets, and property used 22to further these offenses must be frozen, and any profit must 23be removed. State statutes exist that can accomplish that 24goal. Among them are the offense of money laundering,   HB5723- 10 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1violations of Article 29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 2Criminal Code of 2012, the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act, 3and gunrunning. Local prosecutors need investigative personnel 4and specialized training to attack and eliminate these 5profits. In light of the transitory and complex nature of 6conduct that constitutes these criminal activities, the many 7diverse property interests that may be used, acquired directly 8or indirectly as a result of these criminal activities, and 9the many places that illegally obtained property may be 10located, it is the purpose of this Act to create a limited, 11multicounty Statewide Grand Jury with authority to 12investigate, indict, and prosecute: narcotic activity, 13including cannabis and controlled substance trafficking, 14narcotics racketeering, money laundering, violations of the 15Cannabis and Controlled Substances Tax Act, and violations of 16Article 29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 17of 2012; the unlawful sale and transfer of firearms; 18gunrunning; and streetgang related felonies.19    (b) A Statewide Grand Jury may also investigate, indict, 20and prosecute violations facilitated by the use of a computer 21of any of the following offenses: indecent solicitation of a 22child, sexual exploitation of a child, soliciting for a 23sexually exploited child, keeping a place of commercial sexual 24exploitation of a child, juvenile pimping, child sexual abuse 25material, aggravated child pornography, or promoting 26commercial sexual exploitation of a child except as described   HB5723- 11 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1in subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4 of the Criminal Code 2of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.3    (c) A Statewide Grand Jury may also investigate, indict, 4and prosecute violations of organized retail crime. 5    (d) A Statewide Grand Jury may also, if the offenses 6occurred in more than one county or have a statewide nexus or 7if the Attorney General certifies that Statewide Grand Jury 8proceedings are necessary as provided under this subsection 9(d), investigate, indict, and prosecute offenses involving any 10of the following or any related offenses to any of the 11following:12        (1) trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, and 13    related offenses under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code 14    of 2012;15        (2) sexual exploitation of a child under Section 16    11-9.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012;17        (3) permitting sexual abuse of a child under Section 18    11-9.1A of the Criminal Code of 2012;19        (4) failure to report sexual abuse of a child under 20    Section 11-9.1B of the Criminal Code of 2012; 21        (5) promoting prostitution under Section 11-14.3 of 22    the Criminal Code of 2012;23        (6) promoting commercial sexual exploitation of a 24    child under Section 11-14.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012;25        (7) patronizing a sexually exploited child under 26    Section 11-18.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012   HB5723- 12 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1        (8) child pornography or child sexual abuse material 2    under Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012;3        (9) bribery under Section 33-1 of the Criminal Code of 4    2012;5        (10) official misconduct under Section 33-3 of the 6    Criminal Code of 2012;7        (11) solicitation of official misconduct under Section 8    33-3.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012;9        (12) tampering with public records under Section 32-8 10    of the Criminal Code of 2012;11        (13) perjury or subornation of perjury under Sections 12    32-2 and 32-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012;13        (14) communicating with jurors or witnesses under 14    Section 32-4 of the Criminal Code of 2012;15        (15) harassment of representatives for the child, 16    jurors, witnesses or others under Section 32-4a of the 17    Criminal Code of 2012;18        (16) money laundering under Section 29B-1 of the 19    Criminal Code of 2012;20        (17) obstruction of justice under Section 31-4 of the 21    Criminal Code of 2012; or22        (18) racketeering activity under Article 33G of the 23    Criminal Code of 2012.24    The Attorney General may certify that Statewide Grand Jury 25proceedings are necessary to protect witnesses, maintain 26investigative confidentiality, or coordinate statewide   HB5723- 13 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1treatment, regardless of whether the offenses occurred in more 2than one county, if the Attorney General receives a referral 3regarding the offenses under the Illinois Epstein Files 4Investigation Act. If the Attorney General certifies thereto, 5a Statewide Grand Jury may investigate, indict, and prosecute 6offenses described under this subsection (d). Nothing in this 7subsection alters the requirement that trial proceed in a 8county of proper venue under Illinois law.9(Source: P.A. 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 104-245, eff. 1-1-26; 10revised 11-21-25.) 11    (725 ILCS 215/3)12    Sec. 3. Written application for the appointment of a 13Circuit Judge to convene and preside over a Statewide Grand 14Jury, with jurisdiction extending throughout the State, shall 15be made to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court. Upon such 16written application, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court 17shall appoint a Circuit Judge from the circuit where the 18Statewide Grand Jury is being sought to be convened, who shall 19make a determination that the convening of a Statewide Grand 20Jury is necessary.21    In such application, the Attorney General shall state that 22the convening of a Statewide Grand Jury is necessary because 23of an alleged offense or offenses set forth in this Section 24involving more than one county of the State, or with a nexus or 25certification as described under subsection (d) of Section 2   HB5723- 14 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1of this Act for an alleged offense or offenses under 2subsection (d) of Section 2 of this Act, and identifying any 3such offense alleged; and: 4        (a) that he or she believes that the grand jury 5    function for the investigation and indictment of the 6    offense or offenses cannot effectively be performed by a 7    county grand jury together with the reasons for such 8    belief, and9        (b)(1) that each State's Attorney with jurisdiction 10    over an offense or offenses to be investigated has 11    consented to the impaneling of the Statewide Grand Jury, 12    or13        (2) if one or more of the State's Attorneys having 14    jurisdiction over an offense or offenses to be 15    investigated fails to consent to the impaneling of the 16    Statewide Grand Jury, the Attorney General shall set forth 17    good cause for impaneling the Statewide Grand Jury.18    If the Circuit Judge determines that the convening of a 19Statewide Grand Jury is necessary, he or she shall convene and 20impanel the Statewide Grand Jury with jurisdiction extending 21throughout the State to investigate and return indictments:22        (a) For violations of any of the following or for any 23    other criminal offense committed in the course of 24    violating any of the following: Article 29D of the 25    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the 26    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the Cannabis Control   HB5723- 15 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1    Act, the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 2    Act, or the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act; a streetgang 3    related felony offense; Section 16-25.1, 24-2.1, 24-2.2, 4    24-3, 24-3A, 24-3.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.4, 24-4, or 24-5 or 5    subsection 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7), 6    24-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(c) of the Criminal Code 7    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; or a money laundering 8    offense; provided that the violation or offense involves 9    acts occurring in more than one county of this State; and10        (a-5) For violations facilitated by the use of a 11    computer, including the use of the Internet, the World 12    Wide Web, electronic mail, a message board, a newsgroup, 13    or any other commercial or noncommercial on-line service, 14    of any of the following offenses: indecent solicitation of 15    a child, sexual exploitation of a child, soliciting for a 16    sexually exploited child, keeping a place of commercial 17    sexual exploitation of a child, juvenile pimping, child 18    sexual abuse material, aggravated child pornography, or 19    promoting commercial sexual exploitation of a child except 20    as described in subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4 of 21    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; and22        (a-10) For offenses and related offenses described 23    under subsection (d) of Section 2 of this Act; and 24        (b) For the offenses of perjury, subornation of 25    perjury, communicating with jurors and witnesses, and 26    harassment of jurors and witnesses, as they relate to   HB5723- 16 -LRB104 20822 BDA 34376 b1    matters before the Statewide Grand Jury.2    "Streetgang related" has the meaning ascribed to it in 3Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 4Prevention Act.5    Upon written application by the Attorney General for the 6convening of an additional Statewide Grand Jury, the Chief 7Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint a Circuit Judge 8from the circuit for which the additional Statewide Grand Jury 9is sought. The Circuit Judge shall determine the necessity for 10an additional Statewide Grand Jury in accordance with the 11provisions of this Section. No more than 2 Statewide Grand 12Juries may be empaneled at any time.13(Source: P.A. 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 104-245, eff. 1-1-26; 14revised 11-21-25.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.